District of Columbia statutes.
8-171.01

Legislative findings; purposes.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

An adequate, reliable, and continuous supply of energy is essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the District of Columbia and to sustain the growth of the District’s economy;

(2)

The District of Columbia is seriously threatened and adversely affected by the increasing shortages and the escalating prices of nonrenewable energy resources;

(3)

Growth in the consumption of energy resources is due in part to wasteful and inefficient uses of energy, and the continuation of this trend will adversely affect the social, economic, and environmental development of the District of Columbia;

(4)

It is the responsibility of the District of Columbia government to encourage and foster a reliable and adequate supply of energy resources for the District at a level consistent with the protection of public health and safety, the promotion of the general welfare and economic well-being, and the promotion of environmental quality;

(5)

The District of Columbia must provide for the development of a unified energy policy:

(A)

To minimize duplication and overlapping responsibilities for energy-related matters among various District departments, commissions, and agencies; and

(B)

To ensure a reliable and adequate supply of energy resources for the District’s citizens and economy; and

(6)

The establishment of the District of Columbia Office of Energy is in the public interest and will promote the general welfare of the public by assuring coordinated and efficient management of the District’s energy policy and programs.

(b)

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(1)

To establish the District of Columbia Office of Energy;

(2)

To provide for the development of a comprehensive energy plan, policy, and programs for the District of Columbia;

(3)

To achieve effective management of energy functions of the District government through the District of Columbia Office of Energy in cooperation with the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia, the People’s Counsel of the District of Columbia, and all other appropriate District agencies and departments;

(4)

To provide for the development of an emergency energy shortage contingency plan to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of District of Columbia citizens and industry during any public emergency, caused by an actual or impending acute shortage of usable energy resources; and

(5)

To encourage and ensure full and effective public participation in formulation and implementation of a District of Columbia energy policy.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 2, 28 DCR 445

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-901.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed. § 2-901.
1981 Ed., § 1-1901.